Utah statutes.
31A-33-109.   Liability limited.
(1)  No officer or employee of the Workers' Compensation Fund is liable in a
private capacity for any act performed or obligation entered into when done in
good faith, without intent to defraud, and in an official capacity in
connection with the administration, management, or conduct of the Workers'
Compensation Fund or affairs relating to it.
(2)  Subject to the director's fiduciary responsibility as established by
Section 31A-33-106, no director of the Workers' Compensation Fund is liable in
a private capacity for any act performed or obligation entered into when done
in good faith, without intent to defraud, and in an official capacity in
connection with the administration, management, or conduct of the Workers'
Compensation Fund or affairs relating to it.
